Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 3. Business Enterprise Tax Exemptions: Data Center Enterprises.

§ 57-113-21.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Business enterprise” means any business enterprise owning or operating a data center with a minimum capital investment in this state of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) which will create a minimum of twenty (20) new, full-time jobs with a minimum average annual salary of not less than one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the average annual state wage.

“Data center” means a business enterprise that utilizes hardware, software, technology, infrastructure and/or workforce, to store, manage or manipulate digital data.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“State tax” means:

Any sales and use tax imposed on the business enterprise pursuant to law related to the purchase or lease of component building materials and equipment for initial construction of facilities or expansion of facilities that are certified by the Mississippi Development Authority;

Any sales and use tax imposed by law on the business enterprise pursuant to law related to the purchase of replacement hardware, software or other necessary technology to operate a data center;

All income tax imposed pursuant to law on income earned by the business enterprise certified by the Mississippi Development Authority; and

Franchise tax imposed pursuant to law on the value of capital used, invested or employed by the business enterprise certified by the Mississippi Development Authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 57-113-23.
Application for tax exemptions.

Business enterprises wishing to apply for the tax exemptions authorized by this article shall make application to the MDA prior to construction or acquisition of the buildings for the location or expansion of the business enterprise in this state. The application, at a minimum, shall contain:

An overview of the project that includes the selected site, the number of jobs proposed, the length of time necessary for the company to meet its investment and employment requirements;

A two-year business plan, which shall include pro forma financial statements for the project and any service contracts to be performed at the Mississippi facility;

Data supporting the expertise of the project’s principals;

An acknowledgment that the business entity will be required to provide annual documentation to demonstrate that the minimum job requirement is being maintained; and

Such information as may be requested by the MDA.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 57-113-25.
Certification of eligibility for tax exemption; term of exemption; nontransferability of exemption; performance requirements of approved business enterprise.

Upon approval of the application, the MDA shall issue a certification designating the business enterprise as eligible for the tax exemptions authorized by this article. This certification shall document the date by which all commitments must be met.

Upon the issuance of the certification, the business enterprise shall be exempt from state taxes for a period of ten (10) years subject to the performance requirements set out in the agreement required by subsection (3)(c) of this section.

The following conditions, along with any other conditions the MDA shall promulgate from time to time by rule or regulation, shall apply to such exemptions:

Any exemption provided under this article is nontransferable and cannot be applied, used or assigned to any other person or business or tax account without prior approval by the MDA;

No approved business enterprise may claim or use the exemption granted under this article unless that enterprise is in full compliance with all state and local tax laws, and related ordinances and resolutions; and

The business enterprise must enter into an agreement with the MDA which sets out, at a minimum, the performance requirements of the approved business enterprise during the term of the exemption and provisions for the recapture of all or a portion of the taxes exempted if the performance requirements of the business enterprise are not met.

Upon certifying a business enterprise as eligible for the exemptions under this article, the MDA shall forward the certification along with any other necessary information to the Department of Revenue so that the exemptions can be implemented. The Department of Revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, for the implementation of the state tax exemptions granted under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 396, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 57-113-27.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The MDA shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, for the implementation and administration of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2010.